Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 3. Legislative Department

§ 1. Composition and name of legislature.

The legislative power shall be vested in a senate and house of representatives, which shall be designated “the legislature of the State of Wyoming.”

There is a clear distinction between the power to legislate and the right to regulate.

The former is vested exclusively in the legislature by constitutional edict. The latter is sometimes granted public authorities by legislative sanction. The former ordains the law. The latter merely prescribes means and methods for its application. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Legislature may pass any acts not inhibited by constitution. —

Under this section, the legislature may pass any acts that are not expressly or by necessary implication inhibited by the state constitution or the United States constitution. Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1922).

Courts will not enter legislative field of policy making. —

The disposition of the judicial branch of government has always been to scrupulously refrain from encroaching in the slightest way into the legislative field of policy making where factual or economic factors require latitude of discretion. The courts will not and do not substitute their opinions in such matters for the considered judgment of the lawmakers. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

But will prevent legislature from delegating its power. —

The courts have a function to perform, a constitutional right, and the paramount duty to insist that the legislature not renounce its legislative power by any attempt to delegate it away. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Nature of legislature's police power. —

The police power of the legislature is great indeed. Its exercise in the protection and preservation of the public safety, its health, its morals, and in behalf of its general welfare is not merely laudable, it is essential. But however great its power, it is nonetheless not beyond limitation. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Statute beyond power of legislature. —

The legislature did not possess power to enact a law authorizing a verdict by three-fourths of the jury in civil actions. First Nat'l Bank v. Foster, 9 Wyo. 157, 61 P. 466,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1900), reh'g denied, 9 Wyo. 157, 63 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1901).

Delegation of accreditation power. —

Although requirement of accreditation was a delegation of power made by the Wyoming department of education to the accrediting institution, this delegation did not violate the Wyoming Constitution as the Wyoming Constitution does not directly prohibit delegations of public power to private entities or to public agencies, and any constitutional limitation was therefore indirect; here, applicants had sufficient guarantees of due process, and the delegation of accreditation to private entities was reasonable.
Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Applied

in

Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

Stated

in

Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1913); Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

, 109 A.L.R. 534 (1935); In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Members' terms and qualifications.

Senators shall be elected for the term of four (4) years and representatives for the term of two (2) years. The senators elected at the first election shall be divided by lot into two classes as nearly equal as may be. The seats of senators of the first class shall be vacated at the expiration of the first two years, and of the second class at the expiration of four years. No person shall be a senator who has not attained the age of twenty-five years, or a representative who has not attained the age of twenty-one years, and who is not a citizen of the United States and of this state and who has not, for at least twelve months next preceding his election resided within the county or district in which he was elected.

Cross references. —

As to when term of office begins, see art. 3, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For additional provisions concerning senate, see §§

28-3-101

to

28-3-104

.

As to house of representatives, see §§

28-4-101

to

28-4-104

.

Term limit statute unconstitutional. —

Term limit law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

, as it applies to candidates for the state legislature, whether adopted by initiative or legislative action, is unconstitutional and unenforceable because it violates art. 1, § 3, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, §§ 2 and 52(g), Wyo. Const. No law, whether enacted by the legislature through the legislative process or by the people through the initiative process, may condition political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition such as incumbency. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

Right to seek public office for which one has proper qualifications is a fundamental right

such as to be a question of great public importance. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Construction of limiting provisions. —

Statutory and constitutional provisions which tend to limit the candidacy of any person for public office or exclude any citizen from participation in the elective process must be construed in favor of the right of the voters to exercise their choice and should be construed strictly and not extended to cases not clearly covered thereby. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Members of the legislature are state officers

under the provisions of the election laws. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Schieck v. Hathaway, 493 P.2d 759,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1972).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1892); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of age requirement for state public office, 90 ALR3d 900.

§ 3. Legislative apportionment.

Each county shall constitute a senatorial and representative district; the senate and house of representatives shall be composed of members elected by the legal voters of the counties respectively, every two (2) years. They shall be apportioned among the said counties as nearly as may be according to the number of their inhabitants. Each county shall have at least one senator and one representative; but at no time shall the number of members of the house of representatives be less than twice nor greater than three times the number of members of the senate. The senate and house of representatives first elected in pursuance of this constitution shall consist of sixteen and thirty-three members respectively.

Cross references. —

See also §§

28-2-116

to

28-2-119

.

Section 48 of this article must be read in the light of and construed with this section.

State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

Apportionment among counties required. —

Both this section and § 48 of this article require the legislature to be “apportioned” among the counties. State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

And apportionment provisions are mandatory. —

The provisions of the constitution are quite clear, explicit and mandatory. They leave no room for confusion or doubt as to what the legislature is to do about reapportionment and when it is to do it. State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

Federal constitution requires both houses to be apportioned by population. —

The equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the constitution of the United States requires that both houses of a bicameral state legislature be apportioned substantially on a population basis. However, mathematical exactness is not required, so long as the divergences from a strict population standard are based on legitimate considerations incident to the effectuation of a rational state policy. The foregoing rules are applicable regardless of whether the scheme for representation in either house of a bicameral state legislature results from statutory or constitutional provisions. Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

And 1963 Reapportionment Act violated this requirement as to senate. —

The Reapportionment Act of 1963 (ch. 22, Laws 1963), insofar as it provides for representation in the state senate, constitutes an invidious discrimination, and violates the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the constitution of the United States.Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

But not as to house of representatives. —

The Reapportionment Act of 1963 (ch. 22, Laws 1963), insofar as it provides for representation in the house of representatives, is not an invidious discrimination and does not violate the Fourteenth Amendment to the constitution of the United States.Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

1991 reapportionment provisions unconstitutional. —

The 1991 Legislative Reapportionment Act (§§ 28-2-113 through

28-2-115

(repealed)), insofar as it provides for representation in the state house of representatives and senate, constitutes an invidious discrimination and violates the equal protection clause of the fourteenth amendment to the constitution of the United States.Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

Section may be disregarded by legislature. —

This section is inconsistent with the application of the “one person, one vote” principle under circumstances as they presently exist in Wyoming. Consequently, the Wyoming legislature may disregard this provision when reapportioning either the senate or the house of representatives. Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

Section ineffective in reapportionment of senate. —

The conditions and circumstances existing in Wyoming are such that the provisions of this section, which constitute each county an election district and require that each county be represented by at least one senator, are ineffective and are not to be considered when determination is made of the reapportionment of the Wyoming state senate. Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

Since literal compliance therewith would be unreasonable. —

The conditions and circumstances existing in Wyoming are such that literal compliance with the provisions of this section would produce a result that would be wholly unreasonable, untenable and impractical. The end result of literal compliance would be a legislature substantially in excess of 300 members. However, it is obvious that the Wyoming constitutional convention which agreed upon a state constitution intended that the legislative bodies should be comparatively small. It could not have envisioned such an absurd result as would be brought about if the state senate is constituted with each county as a senatorial election district and the county with the least population fixing as near as may be the minimum unit for district representation. Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

Apportionment plan with large population disparity must advance rational state policy. —

As a general matter, an apportionment plan for state legislative districts with a maximum population deviation under 10 percent falls within the category of minor deviations. A plan with larger disparities in population, however, creates a prima facie case of discrimination and therefore must be justified by the state. The ultimate inquiry is whether the legislature's plan may reasonably be said to advance a rational state policy and, if so, whether the population disparities among the districts that have resulted from the pursuit of this plan exceed constitutional limits. Brown v. Thomson, 462 U.S. 835, 103 S. Ct. 2690, 77 L. Ed. 2d 214, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 78 (U.S. 1983).

Wyoming's apportionment policy supported by legitimate state concerns and applied in nondiscriminatory manner. —

There can be no question that Wyoming's constitutional policy — followed since statehood — of using counties as representative districts and ensuring that each county has one representative is supported by substantial and legitimate state concerns. Moreover, it is undisputed that Wyoming has applied this factor in a manner free from any taint of arbitrariness or discrimination. Brown v. Thomson, 462 U.S. 835, 103 S. Ct. 2690, 77 L. Ed. 2d 214, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 78 (U.S. 1983).

Allocation of representative to Niobrara county not violation of equal protection. —

The state of Wyoming does not violate the equal protection clause by allocating one of the 64 seats in its house of representatives to Niobrara county, a county the population of which is considerably lower than the average population per state representative. Brown v. Thomson, 462 U.S. 835, 103 S. Ct. 2690, 77 L. Ed. 2d 214, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 78 (U.S. 1983).

Where a new county is created from part of another county,

the legislative representatives shall be elected to represent both counties until a new apportionment is made. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

Supreme court cannot compel election where apportionment act invalid. —

Though an apportionment act be conceded invalid, the supreme court cannot compel an election under the apportionment found in the constitution. State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1908).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Narrow Reapportionment Holding with Broad Implications for Wyoming. Brown v. Thomson, 462 U.S. 835, 103 S. Ct. 2690, 77 L. Ed. 2d 214, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 78 (1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 253 (1984).

§ 4. Vacancies. [Repealed.]

Section repealed. —

This section was repealed by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1947, House Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 249, adopted by a vote of the people on November 2, 1948, and proclaimed in effect December 1, 1948.

§ 5. When members elected and terms begin.

Members of the senate and house of representatives shall be elected on the day provided by law for the general election of a member of congress, and their term of office shall begin on the first Monday of January thereafter.

Cross references. —

As to date of general election, see §

22-2-104

.

As to terms of office and offices voted on at general elections, see §

22-2-105

.

§ 6. Compensation of members; duration of sessions.

The legislature shall not meet for more than sixty (60) legislative working days excluding Sundays during the term for which members of the house of representatives are elected, except when called into special session. The legislature shall determine by statute the number of days not to exceed sixty (60) legislative working days to be devoted to general and budget session, respectively. The legislature shall meet on odd-numbered years for a general and budget session. The legislature may meet on even-numbered years for budget session. During the budget session no bills except the budget bill may be introduced unless placed on call by a two-thirds vote of either house. The legislature shall meet for no more than forty (40) legislative working days excluding Sundays in any (1) calendar year, except when called into special session. The compensation of the members of the legislature shall be as provided by law; but no legislature shall fix its own compensation. (As amended by Laws 1971, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 723.)

Cross references. —

See also §§

28-5-101

to

28-5-106

.

Increased compensation. —

No member of either house shall, during the term for which he was elected, receive any increase of salary or mileage under any law passed during the term. Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1892).

Legislative days. —

The technical rule of law, making a part of a day a whole day, is not recognized as controlling legislative days. A calendar day, even, is not necessarily a legislative day. A fortiori a fraction of a calendar day is not necessarily, or even presumptively, a legislative day. White v. Hinton, 3 Wyo. 753, 30 P. 953,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1892).

Quoted

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For note dealing with the effect of stopping the clock on legislation, see 10 Wyo. L.J. 203.

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

§ 7. Time and place of sessions.

The legislature shall meet at the seat of government at twelve o'clock noon, on the second Tuesday of January of the odd-numbered years for general and budget session and may meet on the second Tuesday of January of the even-numbered years for budget session, and at other times when convened by the governor or upon call of the legislature as herein provided. The governor by proclamation may also, in times of war or grave emergency by law defined, temporarily convene the legislature at a place or places other than the seat of government. The legislature may convene a special session not to last longer than twenty (20) working days as follows:

Upon written request to the presiding officer of each house of the legislature by a majority of the elected members of each house, the legislature shall convene in special session; or

The presiding officers of each house shall also jointly call a special session for the purpose of resolving a challenge or a dispute of any kind in the determination of the presidential electors. (As amended by Laws 1961, Senate Joint Resolution No. 9, 1973, p. 686; Laws 1971, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 723; Laws 2001, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, § 1.)

Cross references. —

As to length of legislative session, see §

28-1-102

.

Amendments. —

Laws 2001, Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 3, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was approved by vote of the people at the general election held November 5, 2002, and declared in effect November 17, 2002.

The 2001 amendment authorizes the legislature to convene special sessions of the legislature and authorizes legislative leaders of each house to convene a special session to resolve a dispute or challenge to determine presidential electors, specifically by designating the existing provisions as (a), adding “or upon call of the legislature as herein provided ” at the end of the first sentence, adding “The legislature may convene a special session not to last longer than (20) working days as follows,” and adding (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 8. Members disqualified for other office.

No senator or representative shall, during the term for which he was elected, be appointed to any civil office under the state, and no member of congress or other person holding an office (except that of notary public or an office in the militia) under the United States or this state, shall be a member of either house during his continuance in office.

Word “appointed” as used in this section does not include election

to a civil office by a popular vote of the people. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Assisting in prosecution of case. —

This section does not prevent a member of the legislature, who is a member of the bar, from assisting in the prosecution of a case. Ross v. State, 8 Wyo. 351, 57 P. 924,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1899).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Common-Law Rule Against Holding Incompatible Offices — Abolishing the ‘Office’ Limitation. Haskins v. State ex rel. Harrington, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

, 70 A.L.R.3d 1171 (Wyo. 1973),” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974).

§ 9. Compensation not to be increased during term.

No member of either house shall, during the term for which he was elected, receive any increase of salary or mileage under any law passed during that term.

Cross references. —

See also §§

28-5-101

to

28-5-106

.

No legislature can fix its own compensation.

Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1892).

Quoted

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 10. Presiding officers; other officers; each house to judge of election and qualifications of its members.

The senate shall, at the beginning and close of each regular session and at such other times as may be necessary, elect one of its members president; the house of representatives shall elect one of its members speaker; each house shall choose its other officers, and shall judge of the election returns and qualifications of its members.

Cross references. —

As to contesting legislative elections, see §§

22-17-109

et seq.

For provisions authorizing president of senate to preside over joint sessions, see §

28-1-101

.

For other duties of president of senate, see §

28-3-101

.

For duties of speaker of house of representatives, see §

28-4-102

.

Exclusive right to judge the title to a legislative seat lies with that body.

State ex rel. Schieck v. Hathaway, 493 P.2d 759,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1972).

And judiciary cannot determine qualifications. —

Qualifications for membership in the house of representatives are a political question beyond the jurisdiction of the judiciary to determine. State ex rel. Schieck v. Hathaway, 493 P.2d 759,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1972).

§ 11. Quorum.

A majority of each house shall constitute a quorum to do business, but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as each house may prescribe.

§ 12. Rules, punishment and protection.

Each house shall have power to determine the rules of its proceedings, and [to] punish its members or other persons for contempt or disorderly behavior in its presence; to protect its members against violence or offers of bribes or private solicitation, and with the concurrence of two-thirds, to expel a member, and shall have all other powers necessary to the legislature of a free state. A member expelled for corruption shall not thereafter be eligible to either house of the legislature, and punishment for contempt or disorderly behavior shall not bar a criminal prosecution for the same offense.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 13. Journals.

Each house shall keep a journal of its proceedings and may, in its discretion, from time to time, publish the same, except such parts as require secrecy, and the yeas and nays on any question, shall, at the request of any two members, be entered on the journal.

Examination of journals to determine whether act was constitutionally passed. —

It is the duty of the court, where an act is questioned, to examine the legislative journals to determine whether or not such act was passed by a majority of the members elected to each house, as that is a matter which the constitution requires to be shown by the journal. State ex rel. Cheyenne v. Swan, 7 Wyo. 166, 51 P. 209,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1897).

The enrolled bill as signed by the officers of the legislature and the governor is not conclusive on the courts, and the legislative journals may be consulted to determine whether the act has been passed in conformity with the constitutional requirements. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Wright, 62 Wyo. 112, 163 P.2d 190,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1945).

Parol testimony inadmissible to impeach journals. —

Where the journals of both houses of the legislature showed that an act was passed on December 15, parol testimony was not admissible to impeach the journals for the purpose of showing that the act was passed on December 16, since the records of the journals were conclusive. White v. Hinton, 3 Wyo. 753, 30 P. 953,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1892).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Stopping the Clock in the Wyoming Legislature,” see 10 Wyo. L.J. 203.

§ 14. Sessions to be open.

The sessions of each house and of the committee of the whole shall be open unless the business is such as requires secrecy.

§ 15. Adjournment.

Neither house shall, without the consent of the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other place than that in which the two houses shall be sitting.

§ 16. Privilege of members.

The members of the legislature shall, in all cases, except treason, felony, violation of their oath of office and breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest during their attendance at the sessions of their respective houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and for any speech or debate in either house they shall not be questioned in any other place.

Cross references. —

As to libel and slander, see Wyo. Stats. Anno. chapter 29 of title 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Defamation: nature and extent of privilege accorded public statements, relating to subject of legislative business or concern, made by member of state or local legislature or council outside of formal proceedings, 41 ALR4th 1116.

§ 17. Power of impeachment; proceedings.

The sole power of impeachment shall vest in the house of representatives; the concurrence of a majority of all the members being necessary to the exercise thereof. Impeachment shall be tried by the senate sitting for that purpose, and the senators shall be upon oath or affirmation to do justice according to law and evidence. When the governor is on trial, the chief justice of the supreme court shall preside. No person shall be convicted without a concurrence of two-thirds of the senators elected.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

§ 18. Who may be impeached.

The governor and other state and judicial officers except justices of the peace, shall be liable to impeachment for high crimes and misdemeanors, or malfeasance in office, but judgment in such cases shall only extend to removal from office and disqualification to hold any office of honor, trust or profit under the laws of the state. The party, whether convicted or acquitted, shall, nevertheless, be liable to prosecution, trial, judgment and punishment according to law.

Cross references. —

For provision that governor cannot pardon impeached officer, see art. 4, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to suspension of officer pending impeachment and filling vacancy, see §

9-1-203

.

As to impeachment of governor, see §

9-1-214

.

As to impeachment of secretary of state, see §

9-1-304

.

As to removal of justices of peace, see §

18-3-907

.

Not all state officers are subject to impeachment.

In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Phrase “other state and judicial officers,”

contained in this section, refers only to state and judicial officers created by the constitution. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

What officers not removable by impeachment. —

A state superintendent of a water district, appointed by the governor, is a state officer who may be removed by the governor, but is not an officer removable by impeachment. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

The state engineer is not removable by impeachment, but may be removed by the governor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Office of justice of the peace is statutory, not constitutional, office. —

See In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Thus, language “except justices of the peace” is meaningless. —

Since a justice of the peace is not a state officer in the constitutional sense, the language, “except justices of the peace” contained in this section is now without meaning. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

And provisions of art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const., no longer apply to justices of peace. —

See In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

The authority which the people have vested in the legislature, with respect to the office of justice of the peace, and the appurtenant right to abolish or modify the privileges and rights of such an office, is irreconcilably repugnant to the provisions of this section and art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const., which relate to impeachment of state and judicial officers. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Provisions as relate to justices of peace repealed by implication. —

The provisions of this section and art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const., as they relate to justices of the peace, were repealed by implication when the 1965 constitutional amendment to art. 5, Wyo. Const., became effective in 1967. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

The provisions of this section and art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const., as they relate to impeachment of justices of the peace, are irreconcilable with the 1965 constitutional amendment, to art. 5, Wyo. Const., which eliminated justice of the peace courts from the constitution. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Abuse or misuse of contempt power as ground for removal or discipline of judge, 76 ALR4th 982.

§ 19. Removal of officers not subject to impeachment.

Except as hereafter provided, all officers not liable to impeachment shall be subject to removal for misconduct or malfeasance in office as provided by law. Any person appointed by the governor to serve as head of a state agency, or division thereof, or to serve as a member of a state board or commission, may be removed by the governor as provided by law.

Cross references. —

As to removal of appointed officers and commissioners by governor, see §

9-1-202

.

As to removal of county officers, see §§

18-3-901

to

18-3-907

.

Statutory provisions. —

In keeping with this section, the legislature originally delegated certain powers of removal to the governor under §

9-1-202

.State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 401 P.2d 954,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1965).

State engineer. —

State engineer is not removable by impeachment, but may be removed by the governor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

The state engineer is an executive officer appointed by and subject to removal by only the governor of In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

The state engineer is not subject to impeachment; neither the constitution nor the statutes contemplate that a district court should have the authority to remove or replace the state engineer as the administrator of Wyoming water. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

State superintendent of a water district,

appointed by the governor, is a state officer who may be removed by the governor, but is not an officer removable by impeachment. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Office of justice of the peace was formerly of constitutional origin in Wyoming. —

See In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

But is now legislative. —

Although usually the office of justice of the peace is considered to be a constitutional office, it is now a creature of statute. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

And, therefore, not subject to constitution's removal provisions. —

See In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Since a justice of the peace is not a state officer in the constitutional sense, the language, “except justices of the peace” contained in art. 3, § 18, Wyo. Const., is now without meaning. If this language is without meaning, then the provisions of this section are no longer applicable to justices of the peace. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

The authority which the people have vested in the legislature, with respect to the office of justice of the peace, and the appurtenant right to abolish or modify the privileges and rights of such an office, is irreconcilably repugnant to the provisions of this section and art. 3, § 18, Wyo. Const., which relate to impeachment of state and judicial officers. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Grounds for removal of justice of the peace are no longer limited

to those contained in this section. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Provisions as relate to justices of peace repealed by implication. —

The provisions of this section and art. 3, § 18, Wyo. Const., as they relate to justices of the peace were repealed by implication when the 1965 constitutional amendment to art. 5, Wyo. Const., became effective in 1967. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

The provisions of this section and art. 3, § 18, Wyo. Const., as they relate to impeachment of justices of the peace, are irreconcilable with the 1965 constitutional amendment, to art. 5, Wyo. Const., which eliminated justice of the peace courts from the constitution. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Acts occurring in justice's prior term as grounds for removal. —

The supreme court was unable to consider acts occurring in a justice's prior term to be, in and of themselves, grounds for removal; however, such acts were considered as evidential facts bearing upon the justice's general course of conduct during his present term — especially as they related to motive and intent concerning acts charged to him during his current term. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Misconduct during former term not grounds for removal. —

County commissioner's acts of misconduct or malfeasance during former term, which were of such a nature that they might be discontinued, were not grounds for removal from office. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

§ 20. Laws to be passed by bill; alteration or amendment of bills.

No law shall be passed except by bill, and no bill shall be so altered or amended on its passage through either house as to change its original purpose.

Omission of section of act from enrollment and published statute. —

Where 1 section of an act, which actually passed the legislature, is not included in the enrollment and the published statute, but in its stead a section is included which did not pass the legislature, as affirmatively disclosed by the journals, if the section of the act which did actually pass, and is not included in the enrollment and therefore is not a law, has any material relation to other portions of the act so as to modify, restrict, or extend its application, then such other portions must also fall. State ex rel. Cheyenne v. Swan, 7 Wyo. 166, 51 P. 209,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1897).

Amendment permitted. —

An amendment of a bill by adding another section relating to the state veterinarian did not come within the inhibition of this section. Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

Section

7-13-301

(placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation) was constitutionally enacted

in compliance with
Wyo. Const., art. 3, §§ 20 and
24.
Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990);
Mollman v. State, 800 P.2d 466,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1990);
Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990);
Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990);
Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990).

Applied

in

Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

§ 21. Enacting clause of law.

The enacting clause of every law shall be as follows: “Be it Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “How to Draft a Bill,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 285.

§ 22. Limitation on time for introducing bill for appropriation.

No bill for the appropriation of money, except for the expenses of the government, shall be introduced within five (5) days of the close of the session, except by unanimous consent of the house in which it is sought to be introduced.

Cited

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 23. Bill must go to committee.

No bill shall be considered or become a law unless referred to a committee, returned therefrom and printed for the use of the members.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Hynds v. Cahill, 12 Wyo. 225, 75 P. 433,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1904); Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1908); Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964).